Nevada, session 83, AB552.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 432.037 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432.037 1. The Trust Fund for Child Welfare is hereby
created. All benefits for survivors or other awards payable to
children receiving child welfare services pursuant to NRS 432.010
to 432.085, inclusive, in a county whose population is less than
100,000 must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the
Fund.
2. The Division shall:
(a) Keep a separate account for each child who receives money.
(b) [Deduct from the account any services to the child provided
by public money. Any surplus remaining may be expended for
extraordinary items deemed beneficial to the child.
(c)] Remit any [surplus] balance to the parent or legal guardian
of the child, or to the child if the child is emancipated or has reached
the age of 18 years, when the Division is no longer legally
responsible for the child.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
3. The Division shall pay interest to each child’s separate
account maintained in the Trust Fund for Child Welfare at the end
of each interest period. Interest must be paid at a rate equal to the
average of the interest rates quoted by at least three banking
institutions for interest-bearing savings accounts of $3,000 or less
on the first day of each interest period. Interest must be paid on the
child’s account commencing with the first interest period that the
Division is legally responsible for the child. Interest must not be
paid for the interest period during which the child ceases to be the
legal responsibility of the Division.
4. All benefits for survivors or other awards payable to
children receiving child welfare services in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more pursuant to NRS 432.010 to 432.085,
inclusive, must be deposited in the trust fund for child welfare
established in the county treasury. A disbursement from the benefits
for survivors or other awards of a child which is deposited in the
fund may be made to the agency which provides child welfare
services for any child welfare services provided to the child with
public money.
5. As used in this section, “interest period” means that period
not less frequent than quarterly, as determined by the State
Treasurer, for which interest must be paid.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)